Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.200

Audit of records of affected persons.

The commission through its agents may audit the records of any affected person for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The commission must first notify the affected person of their intention to audit and may request supporting documents of the affected person regarding reports submitted on commission forms under RCW 15.62.180.

[ 1989 c 5 s 20.]